Louisiana, session 2026, SB463.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 35:623(D) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 35:623(E) is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§623. Legal recognition of remote online notarial acts
* * *
D.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of this Chapter to the contrary, any
act, transaction, or instrument not excluded under Subsection B of this Section
and which may otherwise be acknowledged before a notary public and two
witnesses pursuant to Civil Code Art. 1836, may be acknowledged by means of
a simultaneous audiovisual transmission without compliance with R.S. 35:625
through 627 if all of the following apply:
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1532 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 463
(a) The party making the acknowledgment is personally known to the
notary public or to at least one of the two witnesses before whom the act is
acknowledged.
(b) The notary public is physically located in a parish in which he is
authorized to exercise notarial functions at the time of the acknowledgment and
is in possession of the original instrument bearing the signature of the party
making the acknowledgment.
(2) An acknowledgment made pursuant to this Subsection shall be valid
only if all of the following apply:
(a) The act, transaction, or instrument is not required by law to be
executed as an authentic act.
(b) The party making the acknowledgment declares to the notary public
and two witnesses, while all are participating in a simultaneous audiovisual
transmission, that the signature on the instrument is his signature and that he
executed the instrument as his own free act and deed.
(c) The notary public states in the acknowledgment that the party was
either personally known to the notary public or if identified by at least one of
the witnesses thereto who personally knew the party, the name of the witness.
(d) The acknowledgment states that it was made pursuant to a
declaration made by a party to the original instrument in simultaneous
audiovisual transmission in the presence of the notary public and two witnesses.
D.E. This Chapter supplements and does not repeal, supersede, or limit the
provisions of the Louisiana Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, R.S. 9:2601 et seq.